Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-15] Examiner; conflict of interest.
(a) An examiner shall not be appointed by the commissioner if the examiner,
either directly or indirectly, has a conflict of interest or is affiliated with
the management of or owns a pecuniary interest in any person subject to
examination under this chapter. This section shall not be construed to
automatically preclude an examiner from being:

(1) An owner;

(2) An insured in a policy or life settlement
contract; or

(3) A beneficiary in a policy that is proposed for a
life settlement contract.

(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of this
section, the commissioner may retain from time to time, on an individual basis,
qualified actuaries, certified public accountants, or other similar individuals
who are independently practicing their professions, even though these persons
may from time to time be similarly employed or retained by persons subject to
examination under this chapter. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next